Hawaii statutes.
§183-33 Effect on other agencies. This
part shall not amend, limit or in any other manner affect the powers of
condemnation conferred upon the several counties, the board of water supply of
the city and county of Honolulu, the department of land and natural resources
and public utility water companies, by any other law, it being the intent of
this part to provide additional funds for the use of the department and to only
limit them in the use of the additional funds. [L 1949, c 274, §5; RL 1955,
§19-24; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §22; am L 1961, c 132, §1; HRS §183-33]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next